Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1747
Marketing plan contract; assignee; rights, defenses.

Any assignee of the seller-assisted marketing plan contract or the seller's rights is subject to all equities, rights, and defenses of the purchaser against the seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 47.